Tennessee, session 114, SB2676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-503(b)(7), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14) days" and substituting "twenty-one (21) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2676
012393
- 1 -